Maryland, session 2025, HB0396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0396*

HOUSE BILL 396
Article – Health – General
7.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) “Local behavioral health authority” means the designated county or
multicounty authority that is responsible for planning, managing, and monitoring publicly
funded mental health, substance–related disorder, and addictive disorder services.
10–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Local behavioral health authority” has the meaning stated in § 7.5–101 of
this article.
10–1202.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE SUBSTANCE ABUSE EARLY
INTERVENTION AND DETOXIFICATION SERVICES FUND.
(B) (1) THERE IS A SUBSTANCE ABUSE EARLY INTERVENTION AND
DETOXIFICATION SERVICES FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO:
(I) PROVIDE UP TO 90 DAYS OF TREATMENT AND
REHABILITATION BY THE LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITY FOR THE MISUSE
OF ALCOHOL AND DRUGS TO STUDENTS EXPELLED FROM SCHOOL IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY; AND
(II) WITH ANY REMAINING MONEY IN THE FUND, COVER
EXPENSES INCURRED BY UNINSURED OR UNDERINSURED MINORS IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY FOR TREATMENT AND SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE LOCAL
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITY FOR THE MISUSE OF ALCOHOL AND DRUGS.
(3) THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL
ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL CONTINUING, NONLAPSING FUND
THAT IS NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 396 3
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(III) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL SEPARATELY ACCOUNT FOR
EACH SOURCE FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) GIFTS OR GRANTS RECEIVED BY THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT FOR THE FUND; AND
(III) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INVESTMENT EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(8) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(9) ANY UNSPENT STATE APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND SHALL
REVERT TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE AT THE END OF THE FISCAL YEAR.
(10) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027, THE
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY HEALTH DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, AN ANNUAL REPORT OF THE FUND THAT INCLUDES, FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR:
(I) AN ACCOUNTING OF ALL FINANCIAL RECEIPTS AND
EXPENDITURES TO AND FROM THE FUND;

HOUSE BILL 396
(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF STUDENTS EXPELLED FROM
SCHOOL IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY WHOSE TREATMENT OR REHABILITATION
WAS PAID FOR BY THE FUND, DISAGGREGATED BY DEMOGRAPHIC CATEGORIES;
(III) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF UNINSURED AND UNDERINSURED
MINORS REFERRED TO THE LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITY IN PRINCE
GEORGE’S COUNTY BY THE DEPARTMENT OR BY THE DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE
SERVICES, DISAGGREGATED BY DEMOGRAPHIC CATEGORIES; AND
(IV) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF UNINSURED AND UNDERINSURED
MINORS WHO RECEIVED TREATMENT OR SERVICES THAT WERE COVERED BY THE
FUND, DISAGGREGATED BY DEMOGRAPHIC CATEGORIES.
(11) THE FUND MAY BE SUBJECT TO AN AUDIT BY THE LEGISLATIVE
AUDITOR.
(C) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$2,000,000 TO THE FUND.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT OR THE DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE SERVICES MAY
REFER STUDENTS WHO HAVE BEEN EXPELLED FROM SCHOOL IN PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY TO THE LOCAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH AUTHORITY FOR TREATMENT AND
REHABILITATION RELATED TO THE MISUSE OF ALCOHOL AND DRUGS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.